Utah statutes.
53-2b-303.   Reciprocal authority.

(1)  An emergency responder from an assisting political subdivision outside of Utah who responds to an emergency in a requesting political subdivision inside of Utah has the same authority to act as an emergency responder of the same type in the requesting political subdivision.

(2)  An emergency responder from an assisting political subdivision outside of Utah who responds to an emergency in a requesting political subdivision inside of Utah and who holds a certification that is valid in the assisting political subdivision or in the assisting political subdivision's state shall, during the emergency response, have the authority to act as if the emergency responder holds the same certification in the requesting political subdivision or in Utah, if the emergency responder's actions authorized by the certification are taken for the purpose of responding to an emergency in the requesting political subdivision.



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

